Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-231
Joint agreements; funds; disbursed by order of board.

All disbursements from such fund shall be made by order of the board in accordance with such rules and regulations and for such purposes as the appointing governing bodies, acting jointly, shall prescribe.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(11), p. 168.